Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 1. Dealing in Furs.

§ 29.1-400.
Unlawful to deal in furs without a permit.

It shall be unlawful to buy, sell, barter, exchange, traffic or trade in, bargain for, solicit for purchase, or possess the hides, furs or pelts of wild animals, or otherwise deal in fur as a business, without having first obtained a permit, subject to the exemptions in §

29.1-401

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-93; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to decisions rendered pursuant to provisions of Chapter 4, §

29.1-400

et seq., being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

§ 29.1-401.
Exemptions as to fur permits.

A permit shall not be required of any hunter or trapper to possess or dispose of the hides, furs or pelts of wild animals legally shot or caught by him nor of any person lawfully engaging in the business of fur farming to possess or to dispose of the hides, furs or pelts of wild animals raised by him.

A permit shall not be required of any Virginia resident who is a member of an American Indian tribe recognized by the Commonwealth or a member of a federally recognized American Indian tribe to buy and possess the hides, furs, pelts or skeletal parts of legally obtained wild animals, except bear as prohibited in §

29.1-536

, when such items are to be used as part of traditional American Indian religious practices. Resale of items obtained under this section is prohibited.

The Board may adopt regulations providing further exemptions to the permit requirement.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-94; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 510; 2016, c. 62.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 62 added subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Indians and Other Native Americans, § 3.

§ 29.1-402.
Permit fees to deal in furs; permit issuance.

The fee for a permit to buy, sell, barter, exchange, traffic or trade in, bargain for, solicit for purchase, or possess the hides, furs or pelts of wild animals shall be as follows:

State resident, $50.

State nonresident, $125.

The permit shall be issued in the name of the firm or individual conducting the business, but shall authorize one person only, who shall be designated as a fur buyer, to personally solicit for the purchase of furs within the area covered by the permit. The fur buyer may be the permittee, if an individual, a member of the firm, or a bona fide employee of such individual or firm who is paid a regular stated monthly salary.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-95; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250.

§ 29.1-403.
Term of permits; application.

All fur permits shall be for the fiscal year, July 1 through June 30, and shall be obtained from the Department by written application.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-98; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-404.
Qualifications of permittee.

The qualifications for securing resident county and state hunting and fishing licenses shall apply to obtaining permits under this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-99; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-405.
Reports of permittees.

The Director may require each permit holder to submit, within ten days after the end of each fiscal year, a detailed activities report in a form as the Director may prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-100; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-406.
Penalty for violations.

The violation of any of the terms of this article shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor. Furthermore, the trial court shall revoke the permit of the fur dealer, and he shall not have a similar permit for that season or for the succeeding season. He may, however, be eligible for a permit thereafter.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-101; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-407.
Forfeiture of furs.

Any furs found in the possession of any person or firm and acquired in violation of this article shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth. The proceedings for forfeiture shall conform as far as practicable to the provisions of Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2, and the net proceeds of the forfeiture shall be paid into the Literary Fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-102; 1987, c. 488; 2012, cc. 283, 756.

Cross references.

As to the Literary Fund, generally, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 8, and § 22.1-142 et seq.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.)” for “Chapter 22 (§

19.2-369

et seq.).”